Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 3. OIL AND GAS

SUBTITLE D. REGULATION OF SPECIFIC BUSINESSES AND OCCUPATIONS

CHAPTER 113. LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 113.001. TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Liquefied Petroleum Gas Code or LPG Code.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Railroad Commission of Texas.

(2) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 76(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

(3) "Employee" means any individual who renders or performs any services or labor for compensation and includes individuals hired on a part-time or temporary basis or a full-time or permanent basis including an owner-employee.

(4) "Liquefied petroleum gas," "LPG," or "LP-gas" means any material that is composed predominantly of any of the following hydrocarbons or mixtures of hydrocarbons: propane, propylene, normal butane, isobutane, and butylenes.

(5) "Container" means any receptacle designed for the transportation or storage of LPG or any receptacle designed for the purpose of receiving injections of LPG for use or consumption by or through an LPG system.

(6) "Appliance" means any apparatus or fixture that uses or consumes LPG furnished or supplied by an LPG system to which it is connected or attached.

(7) "LPG system" means all piping, fittings, valves, and equipment, excluding containers and appliances, that connect one or more containers to one or more appliances that use or consume LPG.

(8) "Transport system" means any and all piping, fittings, valves, and equipment on a transport, excluding the container.

(9) "Transfer system" means all piping, fittings, valves, and equipment utilized in dispensing LPG between containers.

(10) "Transport" means any bobtail or semitrailer equipped with one or more containers.

(11) "Subframing" means the attachment of supporting structural members to the pads of a container but does not include welding directly to or on the container.

(12) "Representative" means the individual designated to the commission by a license applicant or licensee as the principal person in authority and, in the case of a licensee other than a category "P" licensee, actively supervising the conduct of the licensee's LPG activities.

(13) "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or any other business entity, a state agency or institution, county, municipality, school district, or other governmental subdivision.

(14) "Registrant" means any person exempt from the licensing requirements, as established by rule pursuant to Section 113.081 of this code, who is required to register with the commission, any person qualified by examination by the commission, or any person who applies for registration with the commission.

(15) "Intermodal portable tank" means a portable tank built according to the United States Department of Transportation specifications and designed primarily for international intermodal use.

(16) "Intermodal container" means a freight container designed and constructed for interchangeable use in two or more modes of transport.

(17) "Mobile fuel system" means an LPG system, excluding the container, to supply LP-gas as a fuel to an auxiliary engine other than the engine to propel the vehicle or for other uses on the vehicle.

(18) "Mobile fuel container" means an LPG container mounted on a vehicle to store LPG as the fuel supply to an auxiliary engine other than the engine to propel the vehicle or for other uses on the vehicle.

(19) "Motor fuel system" means an LPG system, excluding the container, to supply LP-gas as a fuel to an engine used to propel the vehicle.

(20) "Motor fuel container" means an LPG container mounted on a vehicle to store LPG as the fuel supply to an engine used to propel the vehicle.

(21) "Portable cylinder" means a receptacle constructed to United States Department of Transportation specifications, designed to be moved readily, and used for the storage of LPG for connection to an appliance or an LPG system. The term does not include a cylinder designed for use on a forklift or similar equipment.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 611, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 76(2), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.003. EXCEPTIONS. (a) None of the provisions of this chapter apply to:

(1) the production, refining, or manufacture of LPG;

(2) the storage, sale, or transportation of LPG by pipeline or railroad tank car by a pipeline company, producer, refiner, or manufacturer;

(3) equipment used by a pipeline company, producer, refiner, or manufacturer in a producing, refining, or manufacturing process or in the storage, sale, or transportation by pipeline or railroad tank car;

(4) any deliveries of LPG to another person at the place of production, refining, or manufacturing;

(5) underground storage facilities other than LP-gas containers designed for underground use;

(6) any LP-gas container having a water capacity of one gallon or less, or to any LP-gas piping system or appliance attached or connected to such container; or

(7) a railcar loading rack used by a pipeline company, producer, refiner, or manufacturer.

(b) Nothing in Subsection (a) of this section shall be construed to exempt truck loading racks from the jurisdiction of the commission under this chapter.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Sec. 113.011. REGULATION OF LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS ACTIVITIES. The commission shall administer and enforce the laws of this state and the rules and standards of the commission relating to liquefied petroleum gas.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.014. EMPLOYEES. Sufficient employees shall be provided for the enforcement of this chapter.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.015. FUNDS FOR FINANCING REGULATION OF LPG ACTIVITIES. The commission shall look only to the revenue derived from the operation of this chapter and appropriated by the legislature for expenses of regulating liquefied petroleum gas activities and administering this chapter.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER C. RULES AND STANDARDS

Sec. 113.051. ADOPTION OF RULES AND STANDARDS. Except as provided in Section 113.003 of this code, the commission shall promulgate and adopt rules or standards or both relating to any and all aspects or phases of the LPG industry that will protect or tend to protect the health, welfare, and safety of the general public.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.0511. LIMITATIONS ON RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. (a) The commission may not adopt rules restricting advertising or competitive bidding by a licensee except to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices.

(b) In its rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices, the commission may not include a rule that:

(1) restricts the use of any medium for advertising;

(2) restricts the use of a licensee's personal appearance or voice in an advertisement;

(3) relates to the size or duration of an advertisement by the licensee; or

(4) restricts the licensee's advertisement under a trade name.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1168, ch. 263, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1983. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.052. ADOPTION OF NATIONAL CODES. The commission may adopt by reference, in whole or in part, the published codes of the National Board of Fire Underwriters, the National Fire Protection Association, the American Society for Mechanical Engineers, and other nationally recognized societies or any one or more of these codes as standards to be met in the design, construction, fabrication, assembly, installation, use, and maintenance of containers, tanks, appliances, systems, and equipment for the transportation, storage, delivery, use, and consumption of LPG or any one or more of these purposes.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.053. EFFECT ON CERTAIN CONTAINERS. Rules, standards, and codes adopted pursuant to Sections 113.051 through 113.052 of this code do not apply to containers used in accordance with and subject to the regulations of the United States Department of Transportation or to containers that are owned or used by the United States government.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.054. EFFECT ON OTHER LAW. The rules and standards promulgated and adopted by the commission under Section 113.051 preempt and supersede any ordinance, order, or rule adopted by a political subdivision of this state relating to any aspect or phase of the liquefied petroleum gas industry. A political subdivision may petition the commission's executive director for permission to promulgate more restrictive rules and standards only if the political subdivision can prove that the more restrictive rules and standards enhance public safety.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1020 (H.B. 2663), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER D. LICENSING AND REGISTRATION

Sec. 113.080. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Carrier" means a person licensed for transportation of LP-gas by transport, including the loading and unloading of LP-gas, and the installation and repair of transport systems.

(2) "Portable cylinder exchange service" means an operation conducted under a commission license for the sale of LP-gas in portable cylinders that are not filled on site and that have an LP-gas capacity not greater than 21 pounds.

(3) "Retail and wholesale dealer" means a person licensed for any LP-gas activity except:

(A) the assembly, repair, subframing, or testing of LP-gas containers; or

(B) the sale or installation of motor fuel systems or mobile fuel systems that have an engine with a rating of more than 25 horsepower.

(4) "Testing laboratory" means a person licensed for testing containers, motor fuel systems or mobile fuel systems, transfer systems, or transport systems for the purpose of determining the safety of the containers or systems for LP-gas service, including the necessary installation, disconnection, reconnection, testing, or repair of motor fuel systems or mobile fuel systems, transfer systems, or transport systems involved in the testing of containers.

(5) "Transport outfitter" means a person licensed to:

(A) subframe, test, or sell LP-gas transport containers;

(B) test LP-gas storage containers;

(C) install, test, or sell motor fuel containers and systems or mobile fuel containers and systems;

(D) install transport systems; or

(E) repair transport systems, motor fuel systems, or mobile fuel systems.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.081. LICENSE REQUIREMENT. (a) Unless otherwise stated in this chapter, a person may not engage in any of the following activities unless that person has obtained a license from the commission authorizing that activity:

(1) container activities: the assembly, repair, testing, sale, installation, or subframing of containers for use in this state, except that a license is not required for the sale of a new container of 96 pounds water capacity or less;

(2) systems activities: the installation, service, and repair of systems for use in this state, including the laying or connecting of pipes and fittings connecting with or to systems or serving a system and appliances to be used with LP-gas as a fuel;

(3) appliance activities: the service, installation, and repair of appliances used or to be used in this state in connection with systems using LP-gas as a fuel, except that a license is not required for installation or connection of manufactured unvented appliances to LP-gas systems by means of LP-gas appliance connectors, or where only duct or electrical work is performed to or on an LP-gas appliance; or

(4) product activities: the sale, transportation, dispensation, or storage of LP-gas in this state, except that a license is not required to sell LP-gas where the vendor never obtains possessory rights to the product sold or where the product is transported or stored by the ultimate consumer for personal consumption only.

(b) The licensing requirements of Subsection (a) apply to a person other than a political subdivision who installs or services a motor fuel system or mobile fuel system on a motor vehicle used in the transportation of the general public. Subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) do not apply to intermodal containers or intermodal portable tanks constructed in accordance with United States Department of Transportation specifications.

(c) The licensing requirements of Subsection (a) do not apply to a mobile home park operator who does not obtain any possessory rights to LP-gas products, and utilizes only LP-gas licensees in the installation and maintenance of the LP-gas containers and system. For purposes of this subsection, the term "mobile home park operator" means an individual or business entity owning or operating a place, divided into sites, at which the primary business is the rental or leasing of the sites to persons for use in occupying mobile homes as dwellings. "Mobile home" has the meaning set out in Chapter 1201, Occupations Code.

(d) The commission by rule may exempt journeymen or master plumbers licensed by the Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners from the license requirements of Subsection (a).

(e) The commission by rule may exempt a person licensed under Chapter 1302, Occupations Code, from the license requirements of Subsection (a).

(f) No license is required by an original manufacturer of a new motor vehicle powered by LPG or subcontractor of such a manufacturer who produces a new LPG-powered vehicle for the manufacturer.

(g) The commission by rule may establish reasonable conditions for licensing and exemptions from license requirements for a state agency or institution, county, municipality, school district, or other governmental subdivision.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5428, ch. 1011, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 4, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.797, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.0815. REGISTRATION OF CONTAINER MANUFACTURERS AND FABRICATORS. (a) A person may not engage in the manufacture or fabrication of containers for use in this state unless the person registers with the commission in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

(b) A registration under this section must be renewed annually.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.082. CATEGORIES OF LP-GAS ACTIVITIES; FEES. (a) The commission by rule shall establish license categories for LP-gas activities.

(b) The commission by rule shall establish reasonable application and original license fees and renewal fees for each type of license category established under Subsection (a).

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1168, ch. 263, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 2, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1260, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.083. LIQUEFIED PETROLEUM GAS EMERGENCY. (a) In the event of a temporary statewide, regional, or local shortage of liquid petroleum gas in this state or another state, as determined under Subsection (b) of this section, LP gas trucks and operators meeting all certification, permitting, and licensing requirements of the federal government and another state whose governor has declared an LP gas emergency may transport LP gas in this state without having first obtained any license, permit, or certification ordinarily required under state law.

(b) The governor may determine the existence of a temporary statewide, regional, or local shortage of LP gas in this state or another state and on such a determination, the governor may join with the governor of any other state in declaring an LP gas emergency.

(c) The waiver of Texas licensing, permitting, and certification requirements regarding LP gas trucks and operators is valid only during the time of the emergency. An LP gas emergency may not continue for more than 14 days unless renewed by the governor.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 9, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1991.

Sec. 113.084. APPLICATION. (a) An application for a license shall be submitted to the commission on forms furnished by the commission or on a facsimile of those forms.

(b) A prospective licensee shall submit the required application together with the original nonrefundable license fee established by the commission under Section 113.082 for each type of license category for which an application is made. The applicant shall submit additional information and data with each application as the commission may reasonably require.

(c) A licensee shall submit the nonrefundable renewal fee for each type of license sought along with information and data the commission may reasonably require.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.087. COURSE OF INSTRUCTION, EXAMINATION, AND SEMINAR REQUIREMENTS. (a) The satisfactory completion of the requirements of this section is mandatory, and operations requiring an LP-gas license may not commence, continue, or resume unless examination and seminar requirements are fulfilled. The commission shall prepare, administer, and grade or review an examination required by this section or contract with a testing or proctoring service to prepare, administer, and grade or review the examination.

(b) Before license issuance, the commission shall require the individual designated as the licensee's representative to the commission to provide good and sufficient proof through examination of working knowledge of this chapter and rules of the commission which affect the type of license for which application is made. Thereafter, each licensee shall maintain a qualified representative at all times.

(c) An individual who will be actively supervising operations that require a license under this chapter, other than a portable cylinder exchange service, at any outlet or location, shall be required to provide good and sufficient proof through examination that the supervisor has a working knowledge of the safety requirements and penalties in this chapter and the rules of the commission which apply to that type of license. A licensee who provides portable cylinders to a licensee operating a portable cylinder exchange service shall:

(1) prepare or obtain a manual approved by the commission covering the proper procedures for handling LP-gas in the portable cylinder exchange process;

(2) provide a copy of the manual to each outlet or location of the licensee operating the portable cylinder exchange service; and

(3) provide training approved by the commission regarding the contents of the manual to each individual who will be actively supervising operation of the portable cylinder exchange service at each outlet or location.

(d) As determined by commission rule, each individual who is or will be utilized by a licensee or a public employee of the state, the federal government, or a state or federal subdivision in LPG-related activities shall be required to provide good and sufficient proof through examination that the employee has a working knowledge of the safety requirements in the rules of the commission relating to the activity or activities. Should the commission determine that an individual has a history of failure to comply with the requirements of this code or with the rules of the commission, the commission shall promptly notify the individual in writing of failure to qualify for LP-gas employee certification and the reasons therefor. Written notice by the commission, a written request for a hearing, and the public hearing itself shall be governed by Section 113.091.

(e) No licensee may employ or otherwise utilize any person as a representative to the commission, nor as a supervisor or employee in LPG-related activities, unless and until the person has qualified by satisfactory completion of the examination or training requirements, as applicable, established by this section.

(f) The commission shall promulgate rules relating to changes in representatives, supervisors, and employees, and may permit temporary exemption from the examination or training requirements, as applicable, for a maximum period of 45 days.

(g) In no event shall an original or renewal license be issued to an applicant whose listed representative has not maintained qualified status, as defined by rule, or to any person who has a history of failure to comply with the requirements of this code or with the rules of the commission. The commission shall have written notification of license denial and the reasons therefor prepared promptly and provided to both the representative and the license applicant. Written notice by the commission, a written request for a hearing, and the public hearing itself shall be governed by Section 113.091.

(h) Satisfactory completion of any required examination or training under this section shall accrue to the individual.

(i) Not later than the 30th day after the date a person takes a licensing examination under this chapter, the commission shall notify the person of the results of the examination.

(j) If the examination is graded or reviewed by a testing or proctoring service:

(1) the commission shall notify the person of the results of the examination not later than the 14th day after the date the commission receives the results from the testing or proctoring service; and

(2) if notice of the examination results will be delayed for longer than 90 days after the examination date, the commission shall notify the person of the reason for the delay before the 90th day.

(k) The commission may require a testing or proctoring service to notify a person of the results of the person's examination.

(l) If requested in writing by a person who fails a licensing examination administered under this chapter, the commission shall furnish the person with an analysis of the person's performance on the examination.

(m) The commission by rule may require, in addition to examination requirements as set out in Subsections (b), (c), and (d):

(1) an examination for technical competence that is validated by a recognized educational testing organization or similar organization; or

(2) attendance at approved academic, trade, professional, or commission-sponsored seminars or other continuing education programs.

(n) Prior to qualifying an individual to perform LP-gas work, the commission may establish by rule an initial course of instruction for any person who has not yet passed the examination for the LPG activity for which the person seeks qualification; for any person who has not maintained qualified status, as defined by rule; and for any person whose certification has been revoked pursuant to Subchapter F of this code. If an initial course of instruction is established by the commission, it shall be available at least once every 180 days.

(o) The commission by rule may exempt from any provision of this section:

(1) a journeyman or master plumber licensed by the Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners;

(2) a person licensed under Chapter 1302, Occupations Code; or

(3) company representatives, operations supervisors, or employees of a testing laboratory that was registered under Section 113.135 prior to the effective date of this subsection.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1168, ch. 263, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 3, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 6, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 611, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.798, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 999 (H.B. 473), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1095 (H.B. 3726), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (S.B. 1582), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 113.088. EXAMINATION; SEMINAR FEES. (a) The commission shall establish reasonable examination, course of instruction, and seminar registration fees.

(b) Before seminar attendance or examination of any person, except as provided by Subsection (c), the commission shall receive a nonrefundable fee for each examination or seminar registration.

(c) The commission may exempt voluntary firemen, or public employees of the State of Texas, federal government, or state or federal subdivisions from the examination fee, the examination renewal fee, and seminar fees.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 4, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 999 (H.B. 473), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (S.B. 1582), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 113.089. SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSING. (a) If application is made for a license by a retail and wholesale dealer or for any other type of license specified by commission rule, the commission, in addition to other requirements, shall have an actual inspection conducted of any and all facilities, bulk storage equipment, transportation equipment, and dispensing equipment of the applicant to verify satisfactory compliance with all current safety laws, rules, and practices. The inspection may be waived by the commission on an application resulting solely from a change in legal entities under which a current licensee operates.

(b) The inspection, if required, shall be performed before the issuance of the license, but in no event later than 15 days after the inspection is requested in writing by the applicant for license.

(c) A license for which an inspection under Subsection (a) is required may not be issued until the inspection verifies the applicant to be in satisfactory compliance with all current safety laws, rules, and practices.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 7, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.090. FILING AND REGISTRATION FEES. (a) The commission by rule may establish reasonable fees for the review of site applications related to the installation of containers when site applications are reviewed by the commission before such installation is placed into LP-gas service.

(b) The commission by rule may establish reasonable fees for recording the location of containers at public buildings and commercial installations when prior approval of site applications is not required.

(c) The commission by rule may establish reasonable fees for any registration required under this code.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 5, eff. June 11, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.091. LICENSE DENIAL. (a) If an applicant fails to meet the requirements for original or renewal licensing set out in this chapter, the commission shall promptly send notice to the applicant specifying the reason for the applicant's failure to qualify for license and advising the applicant of the right to request a hearing.

(b) Within 30 days of the notice of denial, an applicant for license under this chapter who is denied a license may request a hearing to determine whether or not the applicant has complied in all respects with the licensing procedure applicable to each type of license sought. The applicant's request for hearing must be in writing and delivered to the commission.

(c) A hearing to determine an applicant's compliance with the licensing procedure applicable to each type of license sought must be scheduled within 30 days following receipt of a request under Subsection (b) of this section.

(d) If the record made at the hearing supports the applicant's claim, the commission shall enter an order in its records to that effect, noting each type of license to which the applicant is found entitled, and the commission shall have the license or licenses issued. If the applicant is found unqualified, the commission shall likewise enter an order in its records to that effect, and no license may be issued to the applicant.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.092. LICENSE ISSUANCE. (a) The commission shall issue the appropriate license to an applicant who has satisfied the licensing procedures and requirements set out in this chapter and in the rules of the commission, except as otherwise provided for in Section 113.163.

(b) The license shall be issued in the name under which the applicant proposes to conduct business.

(c) The license shall belong to the applicant to which it is issued and shall be nontransferable.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 6, eff. June 11, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 609 (H.B. 2172), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 113.093. LICENSE RENEWAL. (a) A person who is otherwise eligible to renew a license may renew an unexpired license by paying the required renewal fee to the commission before the expiration date of the license. A person whose license has expired may not engage in activities that require a license until the license has been renewed.

(b) A person whose license has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the license by paying to the commission a renewal fee that is equal to 1-1/2 times the normally required renewal fee.

(c) A person whose license has been expired for more than 90 days but less than one year may renew the license by paying to the commission a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee.

(d) A person whose license has been expired for one year or more may not renew the license. The person may obtain a new license by complying with the requirements and procedures, including the examination requirements, for obtaining an original license.

(e) A person who was licensed in this state, moved to another state, and is currently licensed and has been in practice in the other state for the two years preceding the date of application may obtain a new license without reexamination. The person must pay to the commission a fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee for the license.

(f) Not later than the 30th day before the date a person's license is scheduled to expire, the commission shall send written notice of the impending expiration to the person at the person's last known address according to the records of the commission.

(g) A renewal license will be issued to a licensee as soon as is practicable after compliance with this section, and fulfillment of insurance, examination, and seminar requirements established by this chapter, and submission of any information and data the commission may reasonably require.

(h) Renewal fees shall be nonrefundable.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1168, ch. 263, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 41, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.094. STAGGERED RENEWAL OF LICENSES. The commission, by rule, may adopt a system under which licenses expire on various dates during the year. For the year in which the license expiration date is changed, license fees payable on a specified date shall be prorated on a monthly basis so that each licensee shall pay only that portion of the license fee that is allocable to the number of months during which the license is valid. On renewal of the license on the new expiration date, the total license renewal fee is payable.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1174, ch. 263, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1983.

Sec. 113.095. LICENSE AND EXAMINATION BY ENDORSEMENT: OUT-OF-STATE LICENSE OR CERTIFICATION. (a) The commission may waive any license requirement for an applicant with a valid license from another state having license requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state.

(b) The commission by rule may waive the requirements of Section 113.087 for an applicant holding a valid examination certificate issued by another state having certification requirements substantially equivalent to those of this state.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1174, ch. 263, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1983. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 617 (S.B. 1668), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 113.0955. CERTIFICATION AND EXAMINATION BY ENDORSEMENT: NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED TRAINING. The commission by rule shall waive the requirements of Section 113.087 for an applicant for a certificate for cylinder filling who:

(1) has completed training consistent with the guidelines established by the Propane Education & Research Council;

(2) submits proof of completion of training described by Subdivision (1);

(3) submits an application for that type of certificate;

(4) pays the applicable original nonrefundable certification fee as established by the commission under Section 113.088; and

(5) completes an examination for cylinder filling that:

(A) is administered by the commission;

(B) is approved by the commission as a comparable examination to the examination administered by the commission and submits proof of completion of the examination to the commission; or

(C) uses Propane Education & Research Council training and examination materials and submits proof of completion of the examination to the commission.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 617 (S.B. 1668), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 113.096. PROVISIONAL LICENSE. (a) The commission may issue a provisional license to an applicant currently licensed in another jurisdiction who seeks a license in this state and who:

(1) has been licensed in good standing for at least two years in another jurisdiction, including a foreign country, that has licensing requirements substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

(2) has passed a national or other examination recognized by the commission relating to the activities regulated under this chapter; and

(3) is sponsored by a person licensed by the commission under this chapter with whom the provisional license holder will practice during the time the person holds a provisional license.

(b) The commission may waive the requirement of Subsection (a)(3) for an applicant if the commission determines that compliance with that subsection would be a hardship to the applicant.

(c) A provisional license is valid until the date the commission approves or denies the provisional license holder's application for a license. The commission shall issue a license under this chapter to the provisional license holder if:

(1) the provisional license holder is eligible to be licensed under Section 113.095; or

(2) the provisional license holder:

(A) passes the part of the examination under Section 113.087 that relates to the applicant's knowledge and understanding of the laws and rules relating to the activities regulated under this chapter in this state;

(B) meets the academic and experience requirements for a license under this chapter; and

(C) satisfies any other licensing requirements under this chapter.

(d) The commission must approve or deny a provisional license holder's application for a license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional license is issued. The commission may extend the 180-day period if the results of an examination have not been received by the commission before the end of that period.

(e) The commission may establish a fee for provisional licenses in an amount reasonable and necessary to cover the cost of issuing the license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 42, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.097. INSURANCE REQUIREMENT. (a) The commission shall not issue a license authorizing LP-gas activities or renew an existing license unless the applicant for license or license renewal provides proof of required insurance coverage with an insurance carrier authorized to do business in this state as evidenced by a certificate of authority having been issued to the carrier by the Texas Department of Insurance or, if the applicant is unable to obtain coverage from such a carrier, provides, on approval of the commission, proof of required insurance coverage issued by a surplus lines insurer that meets the requirements of Chapter 981, Insurance Code, and rules adopted by the commissioner of insurance under that chapter.

(b) A licensee may not perform an LP-gas activity licensed by the commission unless the insurance coverage required by this chapter is in effect.

(c) Except as provided in Section 113.099, the types and amounts of insurance provided in Subsections (d) through (i) are required while engaged in an LP-gas activity licensed by the commission or any activity incidental thereto.

(d) A person licensed to transport LP-gas must carry motor vehicle bodily injury and property damage liability coverage on each motor vehicle, including trailers and semitrailers, used to transport LP-gas. The commission shall establish by rule a reasonable amount of coverage to be maintained, except that coverage may not be less than the amounts required as evidence of financial responsibility under Chapter 601, Transportation Code.

(e) All licensees must carry general liability coverage in a reasonable amount, based on the type or types of licensed activities, which shall be established by commission rule.

(f) A licensee, other than a licensee operating a portable cylinder exchange service, must acquire and maintain appropriate workers' compensation or coverage for its employees under policies of work-related accident, disability, and health insurance, including coverage for death benefits, from an insurance carrier authorized to provide coverage in this state, in the amounts required by the commission.

(g) Notwithstanding Subsection (f) of this section, a state agency or institution, county, municipality, school district, or other governmental subdivision may submit appropriate evidence of workers' compensation coverage by self-insurance if permitted by the state workers' compensation act. The commission may require forms of evidence of coverage for this purpose other than that required under Section 113.098 of this code.

(h) As required by commission rule, a person registered under Section 113.0815 or licensed as a transport outfitter, carrier, retail and wholesale dealer, or testing laboratory must carry completed operations or products liability insurance, or both, in a reasonable amount, based on the type or types of registered or licensed activities.

(i) The commission by rule may exempt or provide reasonable alternatives to the insurance requirements set forth in Subsections (a) through (e) and (h) of this section for a state agency or institution, county, municipality, school district, or other governmental subdivision.

(j) The commission by rule may exempt from the insurance requirements of this section or adopt a reasonable alternative to those requirements for:

(1) a master or journeyman plumber licensed by the Texas State Board of Plumbing Examiners; or

(2) a person licensed under Chapter 1302, Occupations Code.

(k) The commission by rule may allow a licensee to self-insure under Subsection (d), (e), or (f) and by rule shall establish standards for that self-insurance.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 7, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1050, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 14.01, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 8, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.229, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 611, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.538, 14A.799, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 113.098. INSURANCE CONDITIONS. (a) As evidence that required insurance has been secured and is in force, certificates of insurance which are approved by the commission shall be filed with the commission before licensing, license renewal, and during the entire period that the license is in effect. Any document filed with the commission in a timely manner which is not completed in accordance with the instructions indicated on the insurance certificate forms supplied by the commission, but which complies with the substantive requirements of this section and with the rules adopted under this section may be considered by the commission to be evidence that required insurance has been secured and is in force for a temporary period not to exceed 45 days. During this temporary period, a licensee shall file with the commission an amended certificate of insurance which complies with all procedural and substantive requirements of this section and the rules adopted hereunder.

(b) All certificates filed under this section shall be continuous in duration.

(c) Cancellation of a certificate of insurance becomes effective on the occurrence of any of the following events and not before:

(1) commission receipt of written notice stating the insurer's intent to cancel a policy of insurance and the passage of time equivalent to the notice period required by law to be given the insured before the insurance cancellation;

(2) receipt by the commission of an acceptable replacement insurance certificate;

(3) voluntary surrender of a license and the rights and privileges conferred by the license;

(4) commission receipt of a statement made by a licensee stating that the licensee is not actively engaging in any operations which require a particular type of insurance and will not engage in those operations unless and until all certificates of required insurance applicable to those operations are filed with the commission; or

(5) written order of commission.

(d) Cancellation under Subsection (c) of this section shall not become effective until approved by the commission.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 8, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 9, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.099. STATEMENTS IN LIEU OF INSURANCE CERTIFICATES. (a) A person licensed to transport LP-gas that does not operate or contemplate the operation of a motor vehicle equipped with an LP-gas cargo container and does not transport or contemplate the transportation of LP-gas by vehicle in any manner, may make and file with the commission a statement to that effect in lieu of filing a certificate of motor vehicle bodily injury and property damage insurance.

(b) A licensee or an applicant for a license that does not engage in or contemplate engaging in any operations which would be covered by general liability insurance for a period of time may make and file with the commission a statement to that effect in lieu of filing a certificate of general liability insurance.

(c) A licensee or an applicant for a license that does not employ or contemplate the hiring of an employee or employees to be engaged in LPG-related activities in this state may make and file with the commission a statement to that effect in lieu of filing evidence of coverage of workers' compensation or other alternative form of coverage as provided in this subchapter.

(d) A person registered under Section 113.0815 or licensed as a transport outfitter, carrier, retail and wholesale dealer, or testing laboratory that does not engage in or contemplate engaging in any LP-gas operations which would be covered by completed operations or products liability insurance, or both, for a period of time may make and file with the commission a statement to that effect in lieu of filing a certificate of insurance.

(e) Any statement filed pursuant to Subsections (a) through (d) of this section must further state that the licensee or applicant agrees to file a certificate of insurance evidencing appropriate coverage before engaging in any activities that require insurance coverage under this subchapter.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 10, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 239, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 56 (H.B. 2714), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. MOTOR VEHICLES AND TESTING LABORATORIES

Sec. 113.131. TRANSPORT TRUCKS AND TRAILERS. (a) Each transport truck, trailer, or other motor vehicle equipped with an LPG cargo container and each truck used principally for transporting LPG in portable containers shall be registered with the commission.

(b) A licensee who has purchased, leased, or obtained other rights to use any unit described in Subsection (a) of this section shall register that unit in the name or names under which the licensee conducts business before the transportation of LPG by means of that unit.

(c) An ultimate consumer of LPG who has purchased, leased, or obtained other rights to use any unit described in Subsection (a) of this section shall register that unit in the person's name before the transportation of LPG by means of that unit on public roads or highways.

(d) The commission, by rule, shall establish reasonable, nonrefundable annual registration and transfer fees for each LP-gas cargo trailer, semitrailer, bobtail, and cylinder-delivery unit registered or transferred as follows:

(1) the annual registration fee established by the commission shall not be less than $100 nor more than $300.

(2) the annual transfer fee established by the commission shall not be less than $25 nor more than $100.

(e) Any unit registered pursuant to this section shall be covered by motor vehicle bodily injury and property damage liability insurance as prescribed by Section 113.097 of this code.

(f) Any delivery or transport driver shall meet the applicable examination and seminar requirements set out in Section 113.087 of this code.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 9, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 11, eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 1016, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 113.133. MOTOR CARRIER LAWS. No provision of this chapter shall be construed to modify, amend, or revoke any motor carrier law of this state.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.134. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. The Department of Public Safety shall cooperate with the commission in the administration and enforcement of this chapter and the rules promulgated under this chapter to the extent that they are applicable to motor vehicles.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

SUBCHAPTER F. LICENSE AND REGISTRATION FOR AN EXEMPTION: DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTION

Sec. 113.161. VIOLATIONS OF CHAPTER OR RULES; INFORMAL ACTIONS. (a) The commission shall notify a licensee or registrant in writing when it finds probable violation or noncompliance with this chapter or the safety rules promulgated under this chapter.

(b) The notification shall specify the particular acts, omissions, or conduct comprising the alleged violation and shall designate a date by which the violation must be corrected or discontinued.

(c) The licensee or registrant shall report timely compliance or shall request extension of time for compliance if deemed necessary.

(d) If a licensee or registrant objects to the complaint or requirements under this section, or if the commission determines that the licensee or registrant is not proceeding adequately to compliance, then, on written request of the licensee or registrant or order of the commission, a public hearing shall be conducted as provided in Section 113.162 of this code.

(e) If the commission determines that the probable violation or noncompliance constitutes an immediate danger to the public health, safety, and welfare, it shall require the immediate cessation of the probable violation or noncompliance and proceed with a hearing as provided in Section 113.162.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.162. HEARINGS. Any hearing or proceeding under this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure and Texas Register Act.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.163. DENIAL, REFUSAL TO RENEW, OR REVOCATION OF LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FOR AN EXEMPTION IN EVENT OF VIOLATION. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (d) and (f), the commission may not approve an application for a license under this chapter or approve a registration for an exemption under Section 113.081(d) or (e) if:

(1) the applicant or registrant for an exemption has violated a statute or commission rule, order, license, permit, or certificate that relates to safety; or

(2) a person who holds a position of ownership or control in the applicant or registrant for an exemption has held a position of ownership or control in another person during the seven years preceding the date on which the application or registration for an exemption is filed and during that period of ownership or control the other person violated a statute or commission rule, order, license, permit, or certificate that relates to safety.

(b) An applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person has committed a violation described by Subsection (a) if:

(1) a final judgment or final administrative order finding the violation has been entered against the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person and all appeals have been exhausted; or

(2) the commission and the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person have entered into an agreed order relating to the alleged violation.

(c) Regardless of whether the person's name appears or is required to appear on an application or registration for an exemption, a person holds a position of ownership or control in an applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person if:

(1) the person is:

(A) an officer or director of the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person;

(B) a general partner of the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person;

(C) the owner of a sole proprietorship applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person;

(D) the owner of at least 25 percent of the beneficial interest in the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person; or

(E) a trustee of the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person; or

(2) the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person has been determined by a final judgment or final administrative order to have exerted actual control over the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person.

(d) The commission shall approve an application for a license under this chapter or for a registration for an exemption under Section 113.081(d) or (e) if:

(1) the conditions that constituted the violation are corrected or are being corrected in accordance with a schedule to which the commission and the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person have agreed;

(2) all administrative, civil, and criminal penalties are paid or are being paid in accordance with a payment schedule to which the commission and the applicant, registrant for an exemption, or other person have agreed; and

(3) the application or registration for an exemption is in compliance with all other requirements of law and commission rules.

(e) If an application or registration for an exemption is denied under this section, the commission shall provide the applicant or registrant for an exemption with a written statement explaining the reason for the denial.

(f) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the commission may issue a license to an applicant described by Subsection (a) or approve a registration for an exemption for a registrant for an exemption described by that subsection for a term specified by the commission if the license or registration for an exemption is necessary to remedy a violation of law or commission rules.

(g) A fee tendered in connection with an application or registration for an exemption that is denied under this section is nonrefundable.

(h) If the commission is prohibited by Subsection (a) from approving an application for a license or a registration for an exemption or would be prohibited from doing so by that subsection if the applicant, licensee, or registrant for an exemption submitted an application or registration for an exemption, the commission, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, by order may refuse to renew or may revoke a license or registration for an exemption issued to the applicant, licensee, or registrant for an exemption under this chapter. The commission may not revoke or refuse to renew a license or registration for an exemption under this subsection if the commission finds that the applicant, licensee, or registrant for an exemption has fulfilled the conditions set out in Subsection (d).

(i) An order issued under Subsection (h) must provide the applicant, licensee, or registrant for an exemption a reasonable period to comply with the judgment or order finding the violation before the order takes effect.

(j) On refusal to renew or revocation of a person's license or registration for an exemption under Subsection (h), the person may not perform any activities under the jurisdiction of the commission under this chapter, except as necessary to remedy a violation of law or commission rules and as authorized by the commission under a license or registration for an exemption issued under Subsection (f).

(k) In determining whether to refuse to renew or to revoke a person's license or registration for an exemption under Subsection (h), the commission shall consider the person's history of previous violations, the seriousness of previous violations, any hazard to the health or safety of the public, and the demonstrated good faith of the person.

(l) Refusal to renew or revocation of a person's license or registration for an exemption under Subsection (h) does not relieve the person of any existing or future duty under law, rules, or license or registration conditions.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1167, ch. 263, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 11, eff. June 11, 1987; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 609 (H.B. 2172), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 113.164. APPEAL. Any party to a proceeding before the commission is entitled to judicial review under the substantial evidence rule.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

SUBCHAPTER G. FEES AND FUNDS

Sec. 113.201. DEPOSIT AND EXPENDITURE OF FEES AND FUNDS. Money received by the commission under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the General Revenue Fund and spent in accordance with the appropriations made by law.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 144, ch. 65, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER H. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 113.231. INJUNCTIONS. (a) On request of the commission, the attorney general may bring an action in the name and on behalf of the state to enjoin a person from committing any act that violates or does not comply with any provision of this chapter or of any rule promulgated under this chapter.

(b) A suit for injunction instituted pursuant to Subsection (a) of this section shall be in addition to any other remedies at law or in equity.

(c) A district court of any county in which it is shown that all or part of the acts have been or are about to be committed has jurisdiction of an action brought under Subsection (a) of this section.

(d) No bond for injunction may be required of the commission or the attorney general in relation to a proceeding instituted pursuant to Subsection (a) of this section.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

Sec. 113.232. GENERAL PENALTY. (a) In addition to injunctive relief and other penalties provided in this chapter, a person who knowingly violates or fails to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than the maximum fine as set out in Section 12.23 of the Penal Code.

(b) A person previously convicted under Subsection (a) of this section who knowingly violates or fails to comply with this chapter is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than the maximum fine allowed by law for a Class C misdemeanor, nor more than the maximum fine as set out in Section 12.21 of the Penal Code.

(c) A penalty prescribed by this section is in addition to injunctive relief and other penalties provided by this chapter.

(d) Each day the violation or failure to comply continues constitutes a separate offense.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5429, ch. 1011, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 12, eff. June 11, 1987.

Sec. 113.233. ENTRY FOR INSPECTION AND INVESTIGATION. (a) An inspector, employee, or agent of the commission may enter the premises of a licensee under this chapter or any building or other premises open to the public at any reasonable time for the purpose of determining and verifying compliance with this chapter and the safety rules of the commission. This same authority shall extend to private property with the permission of the owner of such private property or an authorized agent of the owner.

(b) Any authorized representative of the commission may enter any buildings or premises where an accident has occurred in which LP-gas was a probable cause for purposes of investigating the cause, origin, and circumstances of such accident. The commission may request that any state or local authority having jurisdiction take appropriate action, to the extent permitted by law, as may be necessary for preservation of property and premises.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 911, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1985; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.234. WARNING TAG. An inspector, employee, or agent of the commission may declare any container, appliance, equipment, transport, system, or LP-gas operation that does not conform to the safety requirements of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, or which is otherwise defective, as unsafe or dangerous for LP-gas service and shall attach a warning tag in a conspicuous location.

Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 325, Sec. 13, eff. June 11, 1987.

Sec. 113.235. SUPPLYING OR REMOVING LPG AFTER WARNING TAG ATTACHED. (a) Any person who knowingly sells, furnishes, delivers, or supplies LPG for storage in or use or consumption by or through a container, appliance, transport, or system to which a warning tag is attached is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 and not more than $2,000.

(b) LP-gas shall be removed from a container to which a warning tag is attached only under the direction of the commission.

(c) In an emergency situation and for immediate need, the commission may allow a reasonable amount of LP-gas to be introduced into a container or may allow an LP-gas system or an LP-gas appliance to be placed into LP-gas service, for a reasonable time period provided the reasons for the warning tag have been eliminated.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 725, Sec. 13, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 113.236. PENALTY FOR UNAUTHORIZED REMOVAL OF TAG. An unauthorized person who knowingly removes, destroys, or in any way obliterates a warning tag attached to a container, appliance, transport, or system is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 and not more than $2,000.

Added by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2031, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1980.

SUBCHAPTER K. LIABILITY OF LICENSE HOLDER

Sec. 113.301. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY OF LICENSED INSTALLER OR SERVICER. A person is not liable for damages caused solely by a malfunction or the installation, modification, or improper operation of an LPG system that the person delivered for installation, installed, or serviced in a residential, commercial, or public building or in a motor vehicle if:

(1) the person was licensed by the commission to perform the installation or service or was a registrant;

(2) the delivery, installation, or service was performed in compliance with the safety rules and standards adopted by the commission;

(3) the person has no control over the operation or use of the LPG system;

(4) the person was not negligent; and

(5) the person did not supply a defective product which was a producing cause of harm.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 80, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 300, Sec. 1, eff. May 26, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 1170), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER L. TESTING OF LP-GAS SYSTEMS IN SCHOOL FACILITIES

Sec. 113.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "School district" means:

(A) an entity created under the laws of this state and accredited by the Texas Education Agency under Subchapter D, Chapter 39, Education Code;

(B) a private elementary or secondary school, other than a school in a residence; or

(C) a state or regional school for the blind and visually impaired or the deaf under Chapter 30, Education Code.

(2) "Supplier" means an individual or company that sells and delivers liquefied petroleum gas to a school district facility. If more than one individual or company sells and delivers LP-gas to a facility of a school district, each individual or company is a supplier for purposes of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.352. DUTY TO TEST FOR LEAKAGE. (a) Each school district shall perform leakage tests for leakage on the LP-gas piping system in each school district facility at least biennially. The tests must be performed before the beginning of the school year.

(b) The school district may perform the leakage tests on a two-year cycle under which the tests are performed for the LP-gas piping systems of approximately one-half of the facilities each year.

(c) If a school district operates one or more school district facilities on a year-round calendar, the leakage test in each of those facilities must be conducted and reported not later than July 1 of the year in which the test is performed.

(d) A test performed under a municipal code satisfies the pressure testing requirements prescribed by this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (H.B. 3918), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 113.353. REQUIREMENTS OF TEST. (a) The school district shall perform the leakage test to determine whether the LP-gas piping system holds at least the amount of pressure specified by the commission.

(b) The leakage test must be conducted in accordance with commission rules.

(c) At the request of a school district, the commission shall assist the district in providing for the certification of an employee of the school district or school, as applicable, to conduct the test and in developing a procedure for conducting the test.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (H.B. 3918), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 113.354. NOTICE OF TEST. (a) A school district shall retain documentation specifying the date and the result of each leakage test or other inspection of each LP-gas piping system until at least the fifth anniversary of the date the test or other inspection was performed.

(b) Before the introduction of any LP-gas into the LP-gas piping system, the school district shall provide verification to the district's supplier that the piping has been tested in accordance with this subchapter.

(c) The commission may review a school district's documentation of each leakage test or other inspection conducted by the school district.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 995 (H.B. 3918), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 113.355. TERMINATION OF SERVICE. A supplier shall terminate service to a school district facility if:

(1) the supplier receives official notification from the firm or individual conducting the test of a hazardous leakage in the facility LP-gas piping system; or

(2) a test at the facility is not performed as required by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.356. REPORT TO BOARD OF TRUSTEES. An identified LP-gas leakage in a school district facility shall be reported to the board of trustees of the district in which the facility is located.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 113.357. ENFORCEMENT. The commission shall enforce this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 53, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER M. CONSUMER SAFETY NOTIFICATION

Sec. 113.401. NOTICE REQUIRED. (a) A person holding a license to install or repair an LPG system who sells, installs, or repairs an LPG system, piping or other equipment that is part of a system, or an appliance that is connected or attached to a system shall provide the following notice to the purchaser or owner of the system, piping or other equipment, or appliance:

WARNING: Flammable Gas. The installation, modification, or repair of an LPG system by a person who is not licensed or registered to install, modify, or repair an LPG system may cause injury, harm, or loss. Contact a person licensed or registered to install, modify, or repair an LPG system. A person licensed to install or repair an LPG system may not be liable for damages caused by the modification of an LPG system by an unlicensed person except as otherwise provided by applicable law.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules relating to the notice required by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 1170), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.